Hawaii statutes.
[§323F-57] Employment, wages, and
benefits. (a) The corporation and the unions representing employees of
the facility or facilities shall meet to discuss the impact of a transfer on
the employees and the feasibility of tempering the adverse effect of layoffs by
amending the employees' collective bargaining agreements pursuant to section
89-8.5.

(b) The employees working at a transferred
facility shall be subject to laws and regulations that apply to private sector
employees. The employees of a private entity or its nonprofit management
entity shall not be governed by state laws that apply to public officers and
employees of the State including but not limited to section 76‑16(b) and
all other sections of chapter 76, chapters 89, 89A, and 89C, and any other laws
and regulations that govern public or government employment in the State.

(c) The private entity or its nonprofit
management entity shall offer all employees of the pre-transfer facility,
employment for a period of no less than six months after the transfer
completion date.

(d) No employee of the corporation who is
separated from service as a result of implementation of an agreement and
transfer under this part shall suffer any loss of any previously earned rights,
benefits or privileges.

(e) Subject to subsection (c), the private
entity or its nonprofit management entity shall take all reasonable steps
necessary to provide for a smooth transition of employees from state employment
to private employment by the private entity or its nonprofit management entity
at a transferred facility. [L 2015, c 103, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next